Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,239.04
Money or property recovered by state; disposition.

All money or property recovered by or returned to the state, including but not limited to dividends, money recovered pursuant to litigation, or the salvage value of damaged property for damages relating to either a liability or property loss for which money from the State Insurance Fund, State Self-Insured Property Fund, State Self-Insured Indemnification Fund, State Self-Insured Liability Fund, Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund, or Tort Claims Fund has been paid, shall be deposited in the respective fund, except that such money or property recovered under the terms of an insurance policy, the premiums for which were paid solely by a cash fund agency and purchased at its request, shall be deposited in the respective cash fund.

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 26;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 146;

Laws 1994, LB 1211, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB256, § 10.